Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2701.08
Certified automated system, defined.

Certified automated system means software certified under the streamlined sales and use tax agreement to calculate the tax imposed by each jurisdiction on a transaction, determine the amount of tax to remit to the appropriate member state, and maintain a record of the transaction.

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 12.